en: raspberry jam
bg: конфитюр от малини
de: Himbeermarmelade
fr: confiture de framboise
hr: džem od malina
it: confettura di lamponi, marmellata di lamponi

en: lemon marmalade
ca: melmelada de llimona
de: Zitronenmarmelade, Zitronen-Marmelade
es: mermelada de limón
hr: marmelada od limuna
it: marmellata di limoni, confettura di limoni

en: cocoa spread, cocoa cream
de: Kakaocreme, Kakao-Creme
es: crema de cacao
fr: Crème de cacao
hr: kakao namaz
it: crema al cacao
pl: krem kakaowy
pt: creme de cacau
sv: kakaokräm

en: hazelnut and cocoa spread
es: crema de cacao y avellanas
fr: Pâte à tartiner aux noisettes et au cacao, crème de cacao et de noisette
hr: pasta s kakaom i lješnjacima
it: crema spalmabile di nocciole e cacao

en: hazelnut spread
fr: pâte à tartiner aux noisettes
hr: lješnjak krem proizvod
it: crema di nocciole

en: milk spread
hr: lino lada mliječni krem proizvod
it: crema spalmabile al latte

en: milk spread with coconut flavor
hr: lino lada mliječni krem proizvod s okusom kokosa
it: crema spalmabile al latte aromatizzata al cocco

en: milk spread with hazelnuts
hr: mliječni krem proizvod s lješnjacima, lino lada, lino lada lješnjak krem proizvod
it: crema spalmabile al latte con nocciole

en: nougat spread
hr: lino lada nougat krem proizvod
it: crema di torrone

en: sauce
af: Sous
ar: صلصة
az: sous
ba: Соус
be: соус
bg: Сос
bn: সস
br: chaous
bs: sos
ca: salsa
cs: omáčka
cy: Saws
da: sovs, sauce
de: Sauce, Soße
el: σάλτσα
eo: saŭco
es: salsa
et: kaste
eu: saltsa
fa: سس
fi: kastike
fo: sós
fr: sauce
fy: saus
ga: Anlann
gd: sùgh
gl: Salsa
he: רוטב
hi: सॉस
hr: umak
ht: Sòs
hu: mártás
hy: սոուս
id: Saus
io: Sauco
is: Sósa
it: salsa
ja: ソース, ドレッシング
jv: Saos
ka: საწებელი
kk: Соус
km: ទឹកជ្រលក់
kn: ಸಾಸ್
ko: 소스
ku: Çênc
ky: соус
la: sūcus
lb: Zooss
li: saus
lt: Padažas
lv: mērce
mg: Saosy
mk: сос
ml: സോസ്
mn: сүмс
ms: sos
mt: zalza
my: ငါးပိရည်
nb: saus
nl: Saus
nn: Saus
or: ସସ୍
pa: ਸੌਸ
pl: Sos, sosu
pt: Molho
qu: Salsa
ro: Sos
ru: соус
sh: умак
sk: Omáčka
sl: Omaka
so: Suugo
sq: salcë
sr: сос
sv: sås
tg: соус
th: ซอส
tk: sous
tl: Sarsa
tr: Sos
uk: соус
ur: چٹنی
uz: qayla
vi: Xốt
vo: sod
zh: 醬

en: aioli
xx: aioli
bg: аиоли
bn: আইওলি
ca: allioli
eo: ajlolea saŭco
es: alioli
eu: alioli
fa: آیولی
fi: aiolikastike
fr: aïoli
gl: alioli
hi: एओली
hu: aioli szósz
hy: աիոլի
io: alioleo
ja: アイオリソース
ko: 아욜리
ml: ഏയോളി
oc: alhòli
or: ଏଇଓଲି
os: айоли
pa: ਏਓਲੀ
pl: ailloli
ro: allioli
ru: айоли
ta: ஐயோலி
th: อัลยอลี
tl: allioli
uk: айолі
uz: ayoli

en: lime aioli
sv: limeaioli

en: curry sauce
ca: salsa de curry
da: karrysovs, karrysauce
es: salsa de curry
fr: sauce au curry
hr: curry umak
it: salsa al curry
nb: karrisaus
nn: karrisaus
sv: currysås

en: barbecue sauce
hr: bbq umak
it: salsa barbecue

en: ajvar
hr: ajvar
it: ajvar
pl: ajwar

en: bechamel sauce, Béchamel sauce, béchamel, bechamel
af: Witsous
ar: صلصة البشاميل
be: Бешамель
bg: бешамел, сос бешамел
ca: beixamel
cs: bešamelová omáčka
da: Hvid sovs
de: Béchamelsauce
el: Μπεσαμέλ
eo: Beŝamelo
es: Bechamel
et: Valge kaste
eu: Bexamel
fa: سس بشامل
fi: Valkokastike
fr: sauce béchamel, béchamel
gl: Bechamel
he: רוטב בשאמל
hr: bešamel umak
hu: Besamel
id: Saus Béchamel
it: besciamella
ja: ベシャメルソース
kk: Бешамель
ko: 베샤멜 소스
ms: Sos Béchamel
nb: hvit saus
nl: Bechamelsaus, bechamel
nn: Bechamel
pl: Beszamel, sos beszamelowy
pt: molho béchamel
ru: бешамель
sk: Bešamelova omáčka, Wikikuchárka
sv: Béchamelsås, béchamel
tr: Beşamel sos
uk: Бешамель
vi: Xốt béchamel
zh: 白汁

en: harissa, harissa paste
xx: harissa
ar: هريسة
bg: Хариса
bn: হরিষ্যা
eo: Hariso
fa: هریسه
he: אריסה
hi: हरीसा
hy: հարիսա
ja: ハリッサ
ka: ჰარისა
ko: 하리사
la: Erise
pa: ਹਰੀਸਾ
pl: harissa, pasta harissa
ru: харисса
sr: Harisa
ur: ھریسا
zh: 哈里薩辣醬

en: Prepacked harissa
fr: Sauce condimentaire harissa
it: harissa preconfezionata

en: espagnole sauce
ca: salsa espanyola
de: Spanische Sauce, Sauce Espagnole
es: salsa española
fa: سس اسپانیول
fi: sauce espagnole
fr: sauce espagnole
he: רוטב אספניול
hr: espagnole umak
id: saus espagnole
it: salsa spagnola
ja: エスパニョールソース
ms: sos espagnole
pt: molho espanhol
ru: эспаньоль
sv: espagnole
tr: espagnole sosu
uk: еспаньйол
zh: 棕醬

en: ketchup, catsup
af: tamatiesous
ar: كتشب
be: кетчуп
bg: кетчуп
ca: quètxup
cs: kečup
cy: sôs coch
da: ketchup
de: Ketchup
el: κέτσαπ
eo: keĉupo
es: kétchup, Tomate ketchup
et: ketšup
eu: ketchup
fa: کچاپ
fi: ketsuppi, tomaattiketsuppi, tomaattiketsuppia, mausteketsuppi
fr: ketchup
ga: citseap
gl: ketchup
he: קטשופ
hr: kečap
hu: ketchup
hy: կետչուպ
id: saus tomat ketchup
is: tómatsósa ketchup
it: ketchup
ja: ケチャップ
jv: saos tomat
ka: კეტჩუპი
kk: кетчуп
kn: ಕೆಚಪ್
ko: 케첩
ku: ketçap, کەتچاپ
la: lycopersici liquamen
lt: kečupas
lv: kečups
mk: кечап
ms: sos tomato
nb: ketchup
nl: ketchup, tomatenketchup
nn: ketsjup
pl: keczup, ketchup, keczap
pt: ketchup
ro: ketchup
ru: кетчуп
sd: ڪيچپ
sk: kečup
sl: kečap
sr: кечап
sv: ketchup
ta: கெச்சப்
th: ซอสมะเขือเทศ
tl: ketsap
tr: ketçap
uk: кетчуп
ur: کیچپ
vi: nước sốt cà chua
yi: קעטשאפ
zh: 番茄醬